dicts/zu_ZA/zu-ZA.aff
PFX B 0 okungazukw [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 okuyo [^aeiou] FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 okuzo [^aeiou] FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 okw/iy [ae] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 okw [aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 okwa [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 ol/iy o RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 olu/iy [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 olung/zYX [aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 olunga/zYX [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 olungayuk o REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 olungayuku [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 olungayukw [ae] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 olungazuk o NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 olungazuku [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 olungazukw [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 oluyo [^aeiou] FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 oluzo [^aeiou] FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 olw/iy [ae] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 olw [aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 olwa [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 ong/zYX [aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 onga/zYX [^aeiou] RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 ongayuk o REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 ongayuku [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 ongayukw [ae] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 ongazuk o NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 ongazuku [^aeiou] NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 ongazukw [ae] NEAR_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 ow [aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 owa [^aeiou] REMOTE_FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 oyo [^aeiou] FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 ozo [^aeiou] FUTURE_RELATIVE/QUALIFICATIVE
PFX B 0 s/di [aeiou]
PFX B 0 s/i [aeiou] REMOTE_PAST_IND
PFX B 0 s/d [aeiou] SITUATIVE
PFX B 0 sa/i [^aeiou] REMOTE_PAST_IND
PFX B 0 sas/id [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST
PFX B 0 sasi/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST
PFX B 0 sasing/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 sasinga/iefX [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 sasingayuk/i o RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 sasingayuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 sasingayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 sasingazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 sasingazuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 sasingazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 sasiyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 sasizo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 si/di [^aeiou]
PFX B 0 si/d [^aeiou] SITUATIVE
PFX B 0 sing/efX [aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 singa/efX [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 singay o SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 singayu [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 singayuk o SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 singayuku [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 singayukw [ae] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 singayw [ae] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 singaz o SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 singazu [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 singazuk o SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 singazuku [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 singazukw [ae] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 singazw [ae] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 siyo [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 sizo [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 u/di [^aeiou]
PFX B 0 u/d [^aeiou] SITUATIVE
PFX B 0 ub/id o RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 ube/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 ubeng/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 ubenga/iefX [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 ubengayuk/i o RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ubengayuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ubengayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ubengazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ubengazuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ubengazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ubeyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 ubezo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 ubu/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 ubung/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 ubunga/iefX [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 ubungayuk/i o RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ubungayuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ubungayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ubungazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ubungazuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ubungazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ubuyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 ubuzo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 ubw/id [ae] RELATIVE_be
PFX B 0 ung/efX [aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 unga/efX [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEG
PFX B 0 ungay o SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ungayu [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ungayuk o SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ungayuku [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ungayukw [ae] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ungayw [ae] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ungaz o SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ungazu [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ungazuk o SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ungazuku [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ungazukw [ae] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 ungazw [ae] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 uyo [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 uzo [^aeiou] SITUATIVE_NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 w/di [ae]
PFX B 0 w/d [ae] SITUATIVE
PFX B 0 w/i [aeiou] REMOTE_PAST_IND
PFX B 0 w/di o
PFX B 0 w/d o SITUATIVE
PFX B 0 wa/i [^aeiou] REMOTE_PAST_IND
PFX B 0 waw/id [ae] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST
PFX B 0 waw/id o RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST
PFX B 0 wawu/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST
PFX B 0 wawung/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 wawunga/iefX [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 wawungayuk/i o RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 wawungayuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 wawungayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 wawungazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 wawungazuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 wawungazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 wawuyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 wawuzo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 waye/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST
PFX B 0 wayeng/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 wayenga/iefX [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 wayengayuk/i o RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 wayengayuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 wayengayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 wayengazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 wayengazuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 wayengazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 wayeyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 wayezo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_REMOTE_PAST+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 wob/id o RELATIVE_be_FUTURE
PFX B 0 wobe/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_FUTURE
PFX B 0 wobeng/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 wobenga/iefX [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 wobengayuk/i o RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 wobengayuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 wobengayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 wobengazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 wobengazuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 wobengazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 wobeyo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_FUTURE+REMOTE_FUTURE
PFX B 0 wobezo/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_FUTURE+NEAR_FUTURE
PFX B 0 wobu/id [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_FUTURE
PFX B 0 wobung/iefX [aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 wobunga/iefX [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be_NEG
PFX B 0 wobungayuk/i o RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 wobungayuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 wobungayukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+REMOTE_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 wobungazuk/i o RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 wobungazuku/i [^aeiou] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
PFX B 0 wobungazukw/i [ae] RELATIVE_be+NEAR_FUTURE_NEG
