dicts/zu_ZA/zu-ZA.dic
aca/BC
akha/BCY
aleka/BC
ambula/BC
andisa/BC
angamela/BC
aza/BC
baba/BC
babula/BC
bambana/BC
bandela/BC
bangisana/BC
bebetha/BC
bekwa/BCY
bethela/BC
bhada/BC
bhakela/BC
bhambatha/BC
bhavumula/BC
bhedlela/BC
bhekela/BC
bhidlanga/BC
bhoboka/BC
bhoka/BC
bhozoma/BC
bhuduza/BC
bhunga/BC
bihlika/BC
bingelela/BC
bizela/BC
bonana/BC
bonisa/BC
bozisa/BC
bulala/BC
bunga/BC
buthana/BC
buyisela/BC
cabangwa/BCY
canula/BC
cathama/BC
ceca/BC
chachaza/BC
chatheka/BC
chicha/BC
choba/BC
chula/BC
cika/BC
cina/BC
cobeka/BC
consa/BC
cula/BC
cwala/BC
cwela/BC
dada/BC
dana/BC
dedela/BC
depha/BC
dikiza/BC
dingakala/BC
dla/BC
dledla/BC
dlisa/BC
dludla/BC
doda/BC
dubula/BC
dukela/BC
dumisa/BC
dwala/BC
ebanda/BC
edlulisa/BC
egeja/BC
ehlisa/BC
ejwayeza/BC
elamela/BC
elusa/BC
emuka/BC
enama/BC
endela/BC
enezela/BC
engeza/BC
enyanyeka/BC
enzakalisa/BC
ephuca/BC
eqela/BC
eshela/BC
esusa/BC
ethembeka/BC
ethwasa/BC
exabana/BC
eyisa/BC
fakaza/BC
fanisela/BC
fenyisa/BC
fihlakala/BC
filisa/BC
fiphaza/BC
fucuza/BC
fukula/BC
fumana/BC
fundisa/BC
funisela/BC
fuya/BC
gada/BC
galela/BC
gandaya/BC
gaqela/BC
gcagca/BC
gcizelela/BC
gcwala/BC
gebhula/BC
genda/BC
gida/BC
gilinga/BC
goba/BC
gogoda/BC
gomela/BC
goqoza/BC
gqala/BC
gqigqa/BC
gqoloza/BC
gubha/BC
gubuzela/BC
guduza/BC
gunya/BC
guqula/BC
gwansa/BC
gwegwesa/BC
gxamalaza/BC
gxiviza/BC
habulisa/BC
hambisana/BC
hefuzela/BC
hiba/BC
hlabeka/BC
hlakahla/BC
hlaluka/BC
hlanekezela/BC
hlanganiswa/BCY
hlawula/BC
hleka/BC
hlephuka/BC
hliza/BC
hlokoma/BC
hlomela/BC
hlubuka/BC
hlumela/BC
hlupheka/BC
hlwabusa/BC
hoba/BC
hoxisa/BC
huma/BC
hweba/BC
jenga/BC
jikelela/BC
jobelela/BC
joyina/BC
kabha/BC
kekela/BC
khaca/BC
khala/BC
khalwa/BCY
khangeza/BC
khapha/BC
khatha/BC
khawula/BC
khephuza/BC
khihla/BC
khithiza/BC
khohlwa/BC
kholwa/BCY
khonga/BC
khotha/BC
khuba/BC
khuhlana/BC
khulela/BC
khulumela/BC
khumbula/BC
khunga/BC
khutha/BC
khwabanisa/BC
khwezela/BC
kinatela/BC
klebhula/BC
klinya/BC
klwebha/BC
kweleta/BC
lahlela/BC
lalwa/BCY
landelana/BC
lasila/BC
lazela/BC
lephula/BC
libazisa/BC
limaza/BC
lingisa/BC
lobiza/BC
londa/BC
loya/BC
lulaza/BC
lumela/BC
luphala/BC
mamatheka/BC
mangalisa/BC
mbabaza/BC
mbulula/BC
melana/BC
memezela/BC
mila/BC
misisa/BC
moyizela/BC
mpompa/BC
mumatha/BC
ncama/BC
ncetheza/BC
ncinza/BC
nconzula/BC
ndiza/BC
nena/BC
nephuzela/BC
nezezela/BC
ngcola/BC
ngena/BC
ngingiza/BC
ngqongqoza/BC
ngwa/BC
nikeza/BC
nka/BC
nkwanya/BC
nonda/BC
nqala/BC
nqaphaza/BC
nqoba/BC
nqwamana/BC
ntanya/BC
ntshontsha/BC
nukela/BC
nxada/BC
nxepheza/BC
nyakambisa/BC
nyanisa/BC
nyanyalata/BC
nyelezela/BC
nyinyitha/BC
nyuka/BC
obula/BC
oda/BC
omelela/BC
ondela/BC
ongamela/BC
ophela/BC
osuleka/BCY
ovuya/BC
patana/BC
phahluka/BC
phala/BC
phambuka/BC
phangela/BC
phaphatheka/BC
phasisa/BC
phathwa/BCY
phehla/BC
phelela/BC
phendukezela/BC
phepha/BC
pheshuka/BC
pheza/BC
phikelela/BC
phindela/BC
phindwa/BCY
phithizela/BC
phonsela/BC
phosisa/BC
phucula/BC
phuluka/BC
phumputha/BC
phunga/BC
phupha/BC
phutha/BC
pikla/BC
potshozela/BC
qabuka/BC
qalanga/BC
qamba/BC
qaphela/BC
qashisa/BC
qedwa/BCY
qeqebula/BC
qhaqhazela/BC
qhaza/BC
qhenya/BC
qhinga/BC
qhuba/BC
qhuga/BC
qhunsula/BC
qhuzula/BC
qikelela/BC
qiqinga/BC
qonda/BC
qonga/BC
qoqotha/BC
qubuka/BC
qulela/BC
qwala/BC
sabalala/BC
saha/BC
sangana/BC
savuna/BC
sebenzisa/BC
sela/BC
seva/BC
shabashaba/BC
shalaza/BC
shanyela/BC
shayelela/BC
shenxa/BC
shikila/BC
shisekela/BC
shomana/BC
shumayeza/BC
shwapha/BC
sila/BC
sindisa/BC
sisinga/BC
sokola/BC
subatha/BC
sutha/BC
tamuza/BC
tekela/BC
thamela/BC
thandezela/BC
thayishwa/BCY
thembisa/BC
thethisa/BC
thiya/BC
tholela/BC
thuka/BC
thungatha/BC
thuthuka/BC
totosa/BC
tshengisa/BC
vala/BC
vika/BC
vota/BC
vumbuka/BC
vunywa/BCY
wala/BC
wola/BC
xaka/BC
xela/BC
xhaza/BC
xinga/BC
xubana/BC
ya/BC
yalela/BC
yela/BC
yinga/BC
yosula/BC
zalela/BC
ziba/BC
zindla/BC
zondela/BC
zwela/BC
PFX C 0 lw/BY [ae] OBJ
PFX C 0 ngak/BY o POTEN_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ngani/BY [^aeiou] POTEN_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 ngazi/BY [^aeiou] POTEN_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sakw/BY [ae] PROG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 sasi/BY [^aeiou] PROG_with_OBJ
PFX C 0 w/BY [aeiou] OBJ
